California statutes. Vehicle Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

2800.3.

(a) Whenever willful flight or attempt to elude a pursuing peace officer in violation of Section 2800.1 proximately causes serious bodily injury to any person, the person driving the pursued vehicle, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for three, five, or seven years, by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by a fine of not less than two thousand dollars ($2,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) Whenever willful flight or attempt to elude a pursuing peace officer in violation of Section 2800.1 proximately causes death to a person, the person driving the pursued vehicle, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for a term of 4, 6, or 10 years.

(c) Nothing in this section shall preclude the imposition of a greater sentence pursuant to Section 190 of the Penal Code or any other provisions of law applicable to punishment for an unlawful death.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “serious bodily injury” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (f) of Section 243 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 485, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2800.4.

Whenever a person willfully flees or attempts to elude a pursuing peace officer in violation of Section 2800.1, and the person operating the pursued vehicle willfully drives that vehicle on a highway in a direction opposite to that in which the traffic lawfully moves upon that highway, the person upon conviction is punishable by imprisonment for not less than six months nor more than one year in a county jail or by imprisonment in the state prison, or by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 111.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2801.

It is unlawful to wilfully fail or refuse to comply with any lawful order, signal, or direction of any member of any fire department, paid, volunteer, or company operated, when wearing the badge or insignia of a fireman and when in the course of his duties he is protecting the personnel and fire department equipment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2802.

(a) Any traffic officer having reason to believe that a vehicle is not safely loaded or that the height, width, length, or weight of a vehicle and load is unlawful may require the driver to stop and submit to an inspection, measurement, or weighing of the vehicle. The weighing may be done either by means of portable or stationary scales and the officer may require that the vehicle be driven to the nearest scale facility, in the event the scales are within five road miles.

(b) Selected inspection facilities and platform scales operated by the Department of the California Highway Patrol may, at the discretion of the commissioner, be open for extended hours, up to and including 24 hours every day. The primary purpose of the extended hours is to assist in the detection of overweight vehicles. These inspection facilities and platform scales shall be located near primary border route points of entry into the state and key routes within the state.

(c) An amount not to exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) shall be available annually from the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the expanded operation of the scale facilities, as specified in subdivision (b). It is the intent of the Legislature that the funds made available pursuant to this subdivision shall be the only funds available for purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 19, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2803.

(a) If the traffic officer determines that the vehicle is not safely loaded or that the height, width, length, or weight is unlawful, he may require the driver to stop in a suitable place and reload or remove such portion of the load as may be necessary to render the load safe or to reduce it to the limits permitted under this code. A suitable place is an area which allows the least obstruction to the highway and which requires the least travel on the highway by the vehicle. Determination of the suitability of an area shall be made by the traffic officer who requires the adjustment. All material so unloaded shall be cared for by the owner or operator of the vehicle at the risk of the owner or operator.

(b) If a certified weight certificate or bill of lading accompanies a vehicle which has been determined to be overweight due to the load on the vehicle, the driver shall submit the certified weight certificate or bill of lading, whichever is appropriate, to the traffic officer when the overweight load is removed in the presence of the officer. The officer may note on the certified weight certificate or bill of lading submitted by the driver the fact that a portion of the load has been removed to bring the vehicle and load within the allowable weight limit specified in this code, and the officer shall return the certificate or bill of lading to the driver.

(c) If the height, width, or length of the vehicle is unlawful, irrespective of any load thereon, or if an unladen vehicle is overweight, the traffic officer may prohibit further movement of the vehicle until a permit is obtained as provided in Section 35780.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 506.)
-------------------------------------------

2804.

A member of the California Highway Patrol upon reasonable belief that any vehicle is being operated in violation of any provisions of this code or is in such unsafe condition as to endanger any person, may require the driver of the vehicle to stop and submit to an inspection of the vehicle, and its equipment, license plates, and registration card.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2805.

(a) For the purpose of locating stolen vehicles, (1) any member of the California Highway Patrol, or (2) a member of a city police department, a member of a county sheriff’s office, or a district attorney investigator, whose primary responsibility is to conduct vehicle theft investigations, may inspect any vehicle of a type required to be registered under this code, or any identifiable vehicle component thereof, on a highway or in any public garage, repair shop, terminal, parking lot, new or used car lot, automobile dismantler’s lot, vehicle shredding facility, vehicle leasing or rental lot, vehicle equipment rental yard, vehicle salvage pool, or other similar establishment, or any agricultural or construction work location where work is being actively performed, and may inspect the title or registration of vehicles, in order to establish the rightful ownership or possession of the vehicle or identifiable vehicle component.

As used in this subdivision, “identifiable vehicle component” means any component which can be distinguished from other similar components by a serial number or other unique distinguishing number, sign, or symbol.

(b) A member of the California Highway Patrol, a member of a city police department or county sheriff’s office, or a district attorney investigator whose primary responsibility is to conduct vehicle theft investigations, may also inspect, for the purposes specified in subdivision (a), implements of husbandry, special construction equipment, forklifts, and special mobile equipment in the places described in subdivision (a) or when that vehicle is incidentally operated or transported upon a highway.

(c) Whenever possible, inspections conducted pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall be conducted at a time and in a manner so as to minimize any interference with, or delay of, business operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 688, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2806.

Any regularly employed and salaried police officer or deputy sheriff, or any reserve police officer or reserve deputy sheriff listed in Section 830.6 of the Penal Code, having reasonable cause to believe that any vehicle or combination of vehicles is not equipped as required by this code or is in any unsafe condition as to endanger any person, may require the driver to stop and submit the vehicle or combination of vehicles to an inspection and those tests as may be appropriate to determine the safety to persons and compliance with the code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 292, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2806.5.

(a) A peace officer making a traffic or pedestrian stop, before engaging in questioning related to a criminal investigation or traffic violation, shall state the reason for the stop. The officer shall document the reason for the stop on any citation or police report resulting from the stop.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply when the officer reasonably believes that withholding the reason for the stop is necessary to protect life or property from imminent threat, including, but not limited to, cases of terrorism or kidnaping. 

(c) This section
 shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 805, Sec. 5.   (AB 2773)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2807.

(a) The California Highway Patrol shall inspect every schoolbus at least once each school year to ascertain whether its construction, design, equipment, and color comply with all provisions of law.

(b) No person shall drive any schoolbus unless there is displayed therein a certificate issued by the California Highway Patrol stating that on a certain date, which shall be within 13 months of the date of operation, an authorized employee of the California Highway Patrol inspected the bus and found that on the date of inspection the bus complied with the applicable provisions of state law relating to construction, design, equipment, and color. The Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol shall provide by rule or regulation for the issuance and display of distinctive inspection certificates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 580.)
-------------------------------------------

2807.1.

(a) The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall inspect and certify every school pupil activity bus specified in Section 546 at least once each year to ascertain whether its condition complies with all provisions of the law.

(b) No person shall drive any motor vehicle specified in subdivision (a) unless there is displayed therein a certificate issued by the Department of the California Highway Patrol stating that on a certain date, which shall be within 13 months of the date of operation, an authorized employee of the Department of the California Highway Patrol inspected such motor vehicle and found that on the date of inspection such motor vehicle complied with the applicable provisions of the state law. The Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol shall provide by rule or regulation for the issuance and display of distinctive inspection certificates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 813, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

2807.2.

The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall, by regulation, provide for a preventive maintenance inspection guide for use by operators of tour buses, motor vehicles specified in Sections 2807 and 2807.1, and vehicles described in subdivisions (a), (b), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of Section 34500. The regulations shall provide that the record of inspection shall be signed by the person making the inspection, and the record of the inspections shall be retained on file by the operator for review and inspection by the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1586, Sec. 4.   Operative July 1, 1989, by Sec. 14 of Ch. 1586.)
-------------------------------------------

2807.3.

(a) The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall inspect and certify every youth bus at least once each school year to ascertain whether its condition complies with all provisions of law.

(b) No person shall drive any youth bus unless there is displayed therein a certificate issued by the Department of the California Highway Patrol stating that on a certain date, which shall be within 13 months of the date of operation, an authorized employee of the Department of the California Highway Patrol inspected the youth bus and found that on the date of inspection the youth bus complied with the applicable provisions of state law. The Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol shall provide, by rule or regulation, for the issuance and display of distinctive inspection certificates.

(c) The Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol may determine the fee and method of collection for the annual inspection of youth buses. The fee, established by regulation, shall be sufficient to cover the cost to the department for youth bus inspections and testing of drivers pursuant to Section 12523. All fees received shall be deposited in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1273, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

2808.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), all schoolbuses transporting pupils to or from any private school or private school activity shall be subject to the same statutes, rules, and regulations relating to construction, design, operation, equipment, and color as are now or hereafter applicable to schoolbuses transporting pupils to or from any public school or public school activity. 

(b) Schoolbuses shall be exempt from such statutes, rules, and regulations relating to construction, design, safe operation, and equipment as the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol shall determine necessary to permit such schoolbuses to continue in operation or when it appears that the results intended to be attained by such rules and regulations are being accomplished by the use of other methods. Such exemption shall be specified by rule or regulation of the commissioner. No such exemption shall be made which in the opinion of the commissioner would jeopardize the safety of the pupils so transported.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 406.)
-------------------------------------------

2809.

All scales and weighing instruments used by any member of the California Highway Patrol to enforce the provisions of this code with respect to weight limitations shall be inspected and certified as to accuracy at least once in each calendar year by the Bureau of Weights and Measures of the Department of Food and Agriculture or by a county sealer of weights and measures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

2810.

(a) A member of the California Highway Patrol may stop any vehicle transporting any timber products, livestock, poultry, farm produce, crude oil, petroleum products, or inedible kitchen grease, and inspect the bills of lading, shipping or delivery papers, or other evidence to determine whether the driver is in legal possession of the load, and, upon reasonable belief that the driver of the vehicle is not in legal possession, shall take custody of the vehicle and load and turn them over to the custody of the sheriff of the county in which the timber products, livestock, poultry, farm produce, crude oil, petroleum products, or inedible kitchen grease, or any part thereof, is apprehended.

(b) The sheriff shall receive and provide for the care and safekeeping of the apprehended timber products, livestock, poultry, farm produce, crude oil, petroleum products, or inedible kitchen grease, or any part thereof, and immediately, in cooperation with the department, proceed with an investigation and its legal disposition.

(c) Any expense incurred by the sheriff in the performance of his or her duties under this section shall be a legal charge against the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 187.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

2810.1.

(a) Any traffic officer may stop any commercial vehicle, as defined in Section 260, that is a rental vehicle and inspect the bills of lading, shipping, delivery papers, or other evidence to determine whether the driver is transporting household goods in violation of the Household Movers Act (Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 19225)) of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code. The officer may only stop and inspect where the officer has probable cause to believe that the vehicle is being operated in violation of that act.

(b) It is a public offense, for which an officer may issue a citation, for a driver to unlawfully transport household goods in violation of the Household
 Movers Act. That public offense is punishable as prescribed in Article 8 (commencing with Section 19277) of Chapter 3.1 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code. It is an infraction to refuse to submit to an inspection as authorized by subdivision (a).

(c) A copy of the citation for any offense described in subdivision (b) shall be sent by the department that employs the traffic officer to the Chief of the Bureau of Household Goods and Services. A copy of a citation shall be removed from any record of the bureau upon a showing that the person was not convicted of the offense or that bail was not forfeited for that offense. A person for whom a copy of a citation has been sent to the bureau and is on file with the bureau may request the bureau for an administrative hearing on that matter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 295, Sec. 4.   (AB 2956)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2810.2.

(a) (1) A peace officer, as described in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, may stop a vehicle transporting agricultural irrigation supplies that are in plain view to inspect the bills of lading, shipping, or delivery papers, or other evidence to determine whether the driver is in legal possession of the load, if the vehicle is on a rock road or unpaved road that is located in a county that has elected to implement this section and the road is located as follows:

(A) Located under the management of the Department of Parks and Recreation, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, the State Lands Commission, a
 regional park district, the United States Forest Service, or the federal Bureau of Land Management.

(B) Located within the respective ownership of a timberland production zone, as defined in Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 51100) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code, either that is larger than 50,000 acres or for which the owner of more than 2,500 acres has given express written permission for a vehicle to be stopped within that zone pursuant to this section.

(2) Upon reasonable belief that the driver of the vehicle is not in legal possession, the law enforcement officer specified in paragraph (1) shall take custody of the vehicle and load and turn them over to the custody of the sheriff of the county that has elected to implement this section where the agricultural irrigation supplies are apprehended.

(b) The sheriff shall receive and provide for the care and safekeeping of the apprehended agricultural irrigation supplies that were in plain view within the boundaries of public lands under the management of the entities listed in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or on a timberland production zone as specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), and immediately, in cooperation with the department, proceed with an investigation and its legal disposition.

(c) An expense incurred by the sheriff in the performance of his or her duties under this section shall be a legal charge against the county.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (e), a peace officer shall not cause the impoundment of a vehicle at a traffic stop made pursuant to subdivision (a) if the driver’s only offense is a violation of Section 12500.

(e) During the conduct of pulling a driver over in accordance with subdivision (a), if the peace officer encounters a driver who is in violation of Section 12500, the peace officer shall make a reasonable attempt to identify the registered owner of the vehicle. If the registered owner is present, or the peace officer is able to identify the registered owner and obtain the registered owner’s authorization to release the motor vehicle to a licensed driver during the vehicle stop, the vehicle shall be released to either the registered owner of the vehicle if he or she is a licensed driver or to the licensed driver authorized by the registered owner of the vehicle. If a notice to appear is issued, the name and the driver’s license number of the licensed driver to whom the vehicle was released pursuant to this subdivision shall be listed on the officer’s copy of the notice to appear issued to the unlicensed driver. If a vehicle cannot be released, the
 vehicle shall be removed pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 22651, whether a notice to appear has been issued or not.

(f) For purposes of this section, “agricultural irrigation supplies” include agricultural irrigation water bladder and one-half inch diameter or greater irrigation line.

(g) This section shall be implemented only in a county where the board of supervisors adopts a resolution authorizing the enforcement of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 169.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2811.

Any traffic officer who observes a fence along any highway, which has been damaged as a result of a traffic accident, shall promptly report same to the owner, lessee, occupant, or person in charge of the property enclosed by the fence, or to the local headquarters of the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2812.

Whenever poisonous gas, explosives, dust, smoke, or other similar substances, or fire exist upon or so near a public highway as to create a menace to public health or safety, members of the California Highway Patrol, police departments, or sheriff’s office may close any highway to traffic when necessary to protect the public from such dangers. Whenever a highway is closed, the governmental agency having control over the highway shall be immediately notified of the reason of the closing and the location.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2812.5.

Whenever visibility limitations pose a significant safety hazard, as determined by a member of the California Highway Patrol, that member may restrict or prohibit the use of any highway by any vehicle subject to regulation by the Department of the California Highway Patrol pursuant to Section 34500.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 119, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2813.

Every driver of a commercial vehicle shall stop and submit the vehicle to an inspection of the vehicle’s size, weight, equipment, loading, and smoke emissions, as well as the driver’s license, medical qualifications, and hours-of-service compliance of a driver of the vehicle at any location where members of the California Highway Patrol are conducting tests and inspections of commercial vehicles and when signs are displayed requiring the stop. Every driver who fails or refuses to stop and submit the vehicle to an inspection when signs are displayed requiring that stop is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 295, Sec. 5.   (AB 2956)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2813.5.

(a) The commissioner shall have exclusive authority in the issuance of stickers as evidence that commercial vehicles have been inspected pursuant to Section 2813 and have been found to be in compliance with minimum safety standards established by the department. The commissioner may make and enforce regulations with respect to the issuance and display of the stickers upon commercial vehicles.

(b) It is unlawful for any unauthorized person, company, corporation, or public or private entity to possess, issue, or display upon a vehicle an unauthorized commercial vehicle safety inspection sticker or a sticker that is either a facsimile of, or is substantially similar to, that issued by the commissioner.

(c) Any violation of subdivision (b) is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 345.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2814.

Every driver of a passenger vehicle shall stop and submit the vehicle to an inspection of the mechanical condition and equipment of the vehicle at any location where members of the California Highway Patrol are conducting tests and inspections of passenger vehicles and when signs are displayed requiring such stop.

The Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol may make and enforce regulations with respect to the issuance of stickers or other devices to be displayed upon passenger vehicles as evidence that the vehicles have been inspected and have been found to be in safe mechanical condition and equipped as required by this code and equipped with certified motor vehicle pollution control devices as required by Part 5 (commencing with Section 43000) of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code which are correctly installed and in operating condition. Any sticker so issued shall be placed on the windshield within a seven-inch square as provided in Section 26708.

If, upon such inspection of a passenger vehicle, it is found to be in unsafe mechanical condition or not equipped as required by this code and the provisions of Part 5 (commencing with Section 43000) of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code, the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 40150) of Chapter 1 of Division 17 of this code shall apply.

The provisions of this section relating to motor vehicle pollution control devices apply to vehicles of the United States or its agencies, to the extent authorized by federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 957.)
-------------------------------------------

2814.1.

(a) A board of supervisors of a county may, by ordinance, establish, on highways under its jurisdiction, a vehicle inspection checkpoint program to check for violations of Sections 27153 and 27153.5. The program shall be conducted by the local agency or department with the primary responsibility for traffic law enforcement.

(b) A driver of a motor vehicle shall stop and submit to an inspection conducted under subdivision (a) when signs and displays are posted requiring that stop.

(c) A county that elects to conduct the program described under subdivision (a) may fund that program through fine proceeds deposited with
 the county under Section 1463.15 of the Penal Code.

(d) State and local law enforcement agencies shall not conduct motorcycle only checkpoints.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 89, Sec. 2.   (AB 1047)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2814.2.

(a) A driver of a motor vehicle shall stop and submit to a sobriety checkpoint inspection conducted by a law enforcement agency when signs and displays are posted requiring that stop.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 14602.6 or 14607.6, a peace officer or any other authorized person shall not cause the impoundment of a vehicle at a sobriety checkpoint if the driver’s only offense is a violation of Section 12500.

 (c) During the conduct of a sobriety checkpoint, if the law enforcement officer encounters a driver who is in violation of Section 12500, the law enforcement officer shall make a reasonable attempt to identify the registered owner of
 the vehicle. If the registered owner is present, or the officer is able to identify the registered owner and obtain the registered owner’s authorization to release the motor vehicle to a licensed driver by the end of the checkpoint, the vehicle shall be released to either the registered owner of the vehicle if he or she is a licensed driver or to the licensed driver authorized by the registered owner of the vehicle. If a notice to appear is issued, the name and driver’s license number of the licensed driver to whom the vehicle was released pursuant to this subdivision shall be listed on the officer’s copy of the notice to appear issued to the unlicensed driver. When a vehicle cannot be released, the vehicle shall be removed pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 22651, whether a notice to appear has been issued or not.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 653, Sec. 2.   (AB 353)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2815.

Any person who shall disregard any traffic signal or direction given by a nonstudent school crossing guard, appointed pursuant to Section 21100, or authorized by any city police department, any board of supervisors of a county, or the Department of the California Highway Patrol, when the guard is wearing the official insignia of such a school crossing guard, and when in the course of the guard’s duties the guard is protecting any person in crossing a street or highway in the vicinity of a school or while returning thereafter to a place of safety, shall be guilty of an infraction and subject to the penalties provided in Section 42001.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 69, Sec. 1.   Effective April 5, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

2816.

It is unlawful to load or discharge children onto or from a youth bus upon a highway at any location where the children must cross the highway upon which the youth bus is stopped, unless traffic is controlled by a traffic officer or an official traffic control signal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 383, Sec. 4.   Effective July 4, 1982.   Operative on date (not sooner than October 1, 1982, or later than January 1, 1983) prescribed by Sec. 13 of Ch. 383.)
-------------------------------------------

2817.

Any person who disregards any traffic signal or direction given by a peace officer authorized pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 70 of the Penal Code to escort funeral processions, if the peace officer is in a peace officer’s uniform, and is in the process of escorting a funeral procession, shall be guilty of an infraction and subject to the penalties provided in subdivision (a) of Section 42001.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1108, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2818.

It is unlawful to traverse an electronic beacon pattern, a flare pattern, cone pattern, or combination of electronic beacon, flare, or cone patterns, provided for the regulation of traffic, or provided in a situation where public safety personnel are engaged in traffic control or emergency scene management.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 120, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. California Traffic Safety Program [2900. - 2935.]



  ARTICLE 1. Traffic Safety [2900. - 2911.]

2900.

There is in this state, the California Traffic Safety Program, which consists of a comprehensive plan in conformity with the laws of this state to reduce traffic accidents and deaths, injuries, and property damage resulting from accidents. The program shall include, but not be limited to, provisions to improve driver performance, including, but not limited to, driver education, driver testing to determine proficiency to operate motor vehicles, and driver examinations and driver licensing, and provisions to improve bicyclist and pedestrian education and performance. In addition, the program shall include, but not be limited to, provisions for an effective record system of accidents, including injuries and deaths resulting from accidents; accident investigations to determine the probable causes of accidents, injuries, and deaths; vehicle registration, operation, and inspection; highway design and maintenance including lighting, markings, and surface treatment; traffic control; vehicle codes and laws; surveillance of traffic for detection and correction of high or potentially high accident locations; and emergency services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 181, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2901.

The Governor may appoint a highway safety representative who shall serve in the Transportation Agency and who shall, in consultation with the Governor and Secretary of Transportation, prepare the California Traffic Safety Program. The Governor is responsible for the administration of the program, and has final approval of all phases of the program, and may take all action necessary to secure the full benefits available to the program under the Federal Highway Safety Act of 1966, and any amendments thereto. The highway safety representative serves at the pleasure of the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 522.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

2902.

To the maximum extent permitted by federal law and regulations and the laws of this state, the Governor may delegate to the Secretary of Transportation and the highway safety representative the authority necessary to administer the program, and the secretary and the representative may exercise this authority once delegated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 523.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

2903.

The Governor may establish an Advisory Committee on the California Traffic Safety Program which shall consist of various officials of state and local government and other persons who are interested in the establishment of a comprehensive program of traffic safety in this state including, but not limited to, representatives of agriculture, railroads, the Institute of Transportation and Traffic Engineering of the University of California, the motor vehicle manufacturing industry, the automobile aftermarket equipment servicing and manufacturing industry, automobile dealers, the trucking industry, labor, motor vehicle user organizations, and traffic safety organizations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1492.)
-------------------------------------------

2904.

The California Traffic Safety Program shall include a local traffic safety program designed to encourage the political subdivisions of this state to establish traffic safety programs consistent with the objectives of the California Traffic Safety Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1492.)
-------------------------------------------

2905.

On or before the fifth legislative day of the 1968 legislative session and each year thereafter, the Governor shall submit a report to the Legislature through such interim committee or committees as may be designated by legislative resolution. Such report shall include a detailed presentation of the California Traffic Safety Program, a statement concerning the progress made in implementing the program and recommendations concerning possible legislative action deemed necessary or desirable to implement the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1492.)
-------------------------------------------

2906.

The California Traffic Safety Program Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury to consist of the funds referred to in Section 2907.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1492.)
-------------------------------------------

2907.

Any funds which are appropriated by Congress for the purposes of carrying out Section 402 of Title 23, United States Code (P.L. 89-564; 80 Stats. 731) and which are apportioned to this state by the Secretary of Commerce pursuant to Section 402 of Title 23, United States Code (P.L. 89-564; 80 Stats. 731) are continuously appropriated for the purposes and uses of the California Traffic Safety Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1492.)
-------------------------------------------

2908.

The Governor shall apportion any funds contained in the California Traffic Safety Program Fund among the various state agencies and local political subdivisions as shall effectuate the purposes of the program, and, in accordance with any federal formula for apportionment or other federal requirements as contained in federal enactments, regulations, or standards promulgated by the Secretary of Commerce.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1492.)
-------------------------------------------

2909.

Any local political subdivision of this state, including, but not limited to, a city, a county, a city and county, a district, or a special district, is authorized to participate in a local traffic safety program within its jurisdiction if such local program is approved by the Governor; provided, however, that any local political subdivision may participate in a traffic safety program other than that promulgated pursuant to the federal Highway Safety Act of 1966.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1492.)
-------------------------------------------

2910.

Such local political subdivision may use, in implementing its local traffic safety program, any funds which are apportioned to it from the California Traffic Safety Program Fund by the Governor pursuant to Section 2908.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1492.)
-------------------------------------------

2911.

All traffic safety programs that receive state funds and that include public awareness campaigns involving emergency vehicle operations shall include in the public awareness campaign, information on the risks to public safety of peace officer motor vehicle pursuits, and the penalties that may result from evading a peace officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 485, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Motorcycle Safety [2930. - 2935.]

2930.

(a) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol.

(b) “Fund” means the California Motorcyclist Safety Fund.

(c) “Program” means the motorcyclist safety program established in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 547, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2931.

A motorcyclist safety program is hereby established in the Department of the California Highway Patrol, to be administered by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 547, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2932.

The commissioner may, through contracts with other public agencies or with private entities, do all of the following:

(a) Provide financial or other support to projects aimed at enhancing motorcycle operation and safety, including, but not limited to, motorcyclist safety training programs. The motorcyclist safety training programs shall comply with criteria which the commissioner, in consultation with other state agencies and national motorcycle safety organizations, may adopt to provide validated motorcyclist safety training programs in the state.

(b) Sponsor and coordinate efforts aimed at increasing motorists’ awareness of motorcyclists.
